Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.210

Crime by license holder—Notice to attorney general or county prosecuting attorney.

If the disciplining authority determines or has cause to believe that a license holder has committed a crime, the disciplining authority, immediately subsequent to issuing findings of fact and a final order, shall notify the attorney general or the county prosecuting attorney in the county in which the act took place of the facts known to the disciplining authority.

[ 1986 c 259 s 13; 1984 c 279 s 22.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.